test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kaavpug_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - kaavpug: #
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Nom: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Gen: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Acc: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Ill: [kaavpugân, ka'vpugân]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Loc: ka´vpugist
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Com: ka´vpugáin
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Abe: ka´vpugttáá
    kaavpug+N+Ess: ka´vpugin
    kaavpug+N+Par: ka´vpugid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Nom: ka´vpugeh
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Gen: ka´vpugij
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Acc: ka´vpugijd
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Ill: ka´vpugáid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Loc: ka´vpugijn
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Com: ka´vpugijguin
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Abe: ka´vpugijttáá
